Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1148
Department; permits to administer anesthesia or sedation; administration of analgesia; adopt rules and regulations.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of the Dentistry Practice Act relating to permits to administer general anesthesia or deep sedation, moderate sedation, or minimal sedation and relating to administration of inhalation analgesia.

Laws 1986, LB 438, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.35;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 481;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 18.